Utah statutes.
59-22-307.   Participating manufacturer.
(1)  "Participating Manufacturer," which is referenced in Subsection
59-22-203(1), is defined in the Master Settlement Agreement as follows:
""Participating Manufacturer" means a Tobacco Product Manufacturer that is or
becomes a signatory to this Agreement, provided that (1) in the case of a
Tobacco Product Manufacturer that is not an Original Participating
Manufacturer, such Tobacco Product Manufacturer is bound by this Agreement and
the Consent Decree, or, in any Settling State that does not permit amendment
of the Consent Decree, a Consent Decree containing terms identical to those
set forth in the Consent Decree, in all Settling States in which this
Agreement and the Consent Decree binds Original Participating Manufacturers,
provided, however, that such Tobacco Product Manufacturer need only become
bound by the Consent Decree in those Settling State in which the Settling
State has filed a Released Claim against it, and (2) in the case of a Tobacco
Product Manufacturer that signs this Agreement after the MSA Execution Date,
such Tobacco Product Manufacturer, within a reasonable period of time after
signing this Agreement, makes any payments, including interest thereon at the
Prime Rate, that it would have been obligated to make in the intervening
period had it been a signatory as of the MSA Execution Date.  "Participating
Manufacturer" shall also include the successor of a Participating
Manufacturer.  Except as expressly provided in this Agreement, once an entity
becomes a Participating Manufacturer such entity shall permanently retain the
status of Participating Manufacturer.  Each Participating Manufacturer shall
regularly report its shipments of Cigarettes in or to the 50 United States,
the District of Columbia and Puerto Rico to Management Science Associates,
Inc., or a successor entity as set forth in Subsection (mm).  Solely for
purposes of calculations pursuant to Subsection IX(d), a Tobacco Product
Manufacturer that is not a signatory to this Agreement shall be deemed to be a
"Participating Manufacturer" if the Original Participating Manufacturers
unanimously consent in writing."
(2)  Subsection IX(d) relates to Nonparticipating Manufacturer Adjustments.
